Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 15. Joint municipal electric power.
§ 77-5-775.
Personal liability of certain personnel.

No commissioner of any joint agency or officer of any municipality or person or persons acting in their behalf, while acting within the scope of their authority, shall be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of his carrying out any of the powers expressly or impliedly given in this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 33, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-777.
Exemption from requirements of separate actions under this article when governing authorities of utility commission and municipality are same.

Whenever the governing authorities of the utility commission and of any municipality are one and the same, separate actions required by this article by the governing authorities of the municipality with respect to an action or determination required by this article by the governing authorities of the municipality with respect to an action or determination required by this article of a utility commission, including the ratification of resolutions of said utility commission, shall not be necessary, but the action required of a utility commission by this article shall be deemed to have occurred when done by the body forming the governing authorities and the utility commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 34, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-779.
Provisions supplemental and additional.

The foregoing sections of this article shall be deemed to provide an additional, alternative and complete method for the doing of the things authorized thereby and shall be deemed and construed to be supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws, and shall not be regarded as in derogation of any powers now existing; provided, however, that insofar as the provisions of this article are inconsistent with the provisions of any other general, special or local law, the provisions of this article shall be controlling. Nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize the issuance of bonds for the purpose of financing the ownership of any facilities or any interest therein by any private corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 35, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-781.
Authority or right of other entities to engage in retail distribution of electric power not impaired.

Nothing contained in this article shall affect in any manner the authority or rights of any public utility, any electric power association, or any municipality to engage in the retail distribution of electric power within the service areas as certificated to them by the public service commission under the Public Utilities Act of 1956.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 36, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).

§ 77-5-783.
Construction of article.

In order to effectuate the purposes and policies prescribed in this article, the provisions hereof shall be liberally construed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 363, § 38, eff from and after passage (approved March 14, 1978).